Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF676.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2161YH (3) 91 je/js H.F. 676 Section 1. Section 216.6, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. (1) An employer shall provide reasonable 3 accommodations to an employee based on medical conditions 4 related to the employeeâs pregnancy or childbirth if the 5 employee so requests with the advice of the employeeâs health 6 care provider. 7 (2) For purposes of this paragraph âfâ , âreasonable 8 accommodationsâ means actions which would permit an employee 9 with a medical condition relating to the employeeâs pregnancy 10 or childbirth to perform in a reasonable manner the activities 11 involved in the employeeâs specific occupation and include but 12 are not limited to the provision of an accessible worksite, 13 acquisition or modification of equipment, job restructuring, 14 and a modified work schedule. âReasonable accommodationsâ does 15 not mean any action that would impose an undue hardship on the 16 business of the employer from whom the action is requested. 17